Tennessee, session 114, SB0667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-106(a), is amended by deleting
the language "three (3)" and substituting instead "four (4)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0667
002208
- 1 -